New Jersey, session 221, A471.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 19 of P.L.1993, c.275 (C.22A:1-1.1) is amended to read as follows: 19. a. [Every] Except for certain full-time government employees compensated pursuant to N.J.S.2B:20-16, every person serving as a juror in New Jersey courts, whether as a grand or petit juror, shall receive, for each day's attendance at [such] these courts, the sum of [$5] $40. b.    [In addition to the amounts received pursuant to subsection a. of this section,  each person serving as a juror, other than a person compensated pursuant to N.J.S.2B:20-16, shall be paid $35 for each consecutive day of attendance in excess of three days. For the purposes of this subsection, "consecutive" days of attendance shall be counted excluding Saturdays, Sundays, State holidays and days when a trial is in recess.] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.   ,c.   )(pending before the Legislature as this bill) c.     The Assignment Judge of the vicinage shall designate the method of juror payment. The Assignment Judge shall keep an account of all juror fees paid under this section and provide each juror with a statement of the number of days the juror served and the amount of fees to which the juror is entitled. d.    If in-person jury service is required of jurors, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide jurors with travel reimbursement to and from each jurors residence to the courthouse.  This reimbursement shall be for all modes of transportation, including motor vehicle, train, bus, or any other form of public transportation.  For motor vehicle travelers, this reimbursement shall be determined by mileage, set to the standard state reimbursement mileage rate, if the jurors own personal vehicle was used for jury-related travel.  Public transportation reimbursement shall be based on the jurors actual fare paid. Each juror seeking reimbursement shall provide proof of mileage or fare, as well as the method of transportation used to travel between the jurors residence and the courthouse or between the nearest public transportation station to the courthouse. e.     If in-person juror service is required, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall reimburse each juror for any road tolls the juror incurs for traveling to and from the courthouse for the duration of jury service.  Each juror requesting reimbursement shall provide proof of tolls paid. f.     Private employers, with 10 or more employees, shall pay up to five days of compensation for employees who are selected for jury duty.  These employers are precluded from applying an employees paid-time-off benefits, if applicable, during this time.  These employers may request proof of jury duty served and may require each juror who is seeking the benefits of this section to apply the jury duty paycheck that the juror received to the compensation amount owed to the employee under this section. g.    The work compensation applicable throughout the duration of jury duty service for private employees in New Jersey who work on a shift schedule, shall be the same as that set forth in N.J.A.C. 4A: 6-1.19.  This also shall apply to employers who have contracts with the State of New Jersey. (cf: P.L.2001, c.38, s.1) 2.    There is appropriated $20,000,000 from the General Fund to the Administrative Office of the Courts to fund the $40 daily pay rate and benefits and reimbursements for grand and petit jurors pursuant to section 19 of P.L.1993, c.275 (C.22A:1-1.1). 3.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next following enactment.